test/src/gt-desc-yamls/comp-nouns_gt-desc.ana.yaml
  Noun - dábálašbeaivebálká: # DABALAS SgNomCmp + ALBMILONG 
    dábálaš+A+Cmp/Attr+Cmp#beaivebálká+N+Sg+Nom: dábálašbeaivebálká
    dábálaš+Err/Orth+Err/Orth+A+Cmp/Attr+Cmp#beaivebálká+N+Sg+Nom: [dáválážžbeaivebálká]
    dábálaš+Err/Orth-a/á+Err/Orth+A+Cmp/Attr+Cmp#beaivebálká+N+Sg+Nom: [dábalážžbeaivebálká]
    dábálaš+Err/Orth+A+Cmp/Attr+Cmp#beaivebálká+N+Sg+Nom: [dáválašbeaivebálká, dábálážžbeaivebálká]
    dábálaš+Err/Orth-a/á+A+Cmp/Attr+Cmp#beaivebálká+N+Sg+Nom: [dábalašbeaivebálká]
    dábálaš+A+Cmp/Attr+Cmp#beaivebálká+N+Sg+Gen: dábálašbeaivebálkká
    dábálaš+Err/Orth+Err/Orth+A+Cmp/Attr+Cmp#beaivebálká+N+Sg+Gen: [dáválážžbeaivebálkká]
    dábálaš+Err/Orth-a/á+Err/Orth+A+Cmp/Attr+Cmp#beaivebálká+N+Sg+Gen: [dábalážžbeaivebálkká]
    dábálaš+Err/Orth+A+Cmp/Attr+Cmp#beaivebálká+N+Sg+Gen: [dábálážžbeaivebálkká, dáválašbeaivebálkká]
    dábálaš+Err/Orth-a/á+A+Cmp/Attr+Cmp#beaivebálká+N+Sg+Gen: [dábalašbeaivebálkká]
    dábálaš+A+Cmp/Attr+Cmp#beaivebálká+N+Sg+Acc: dábálašbeaivebálkká
    dábálaš+Err/Orth+Err/Orth+A+Cmp/Attr+Cmp#beaivebálká+N+Sg+Acc: [dáválážžbeaivebálkká]
    dábálaš+Err/Orth-a/á+Err/Orth+A+Cmp/Attr+Cmp#beaivebálká+N+Sg+Acc: [dábalážžbeaivebálkká]
    dábálaš+Err/Orth+A+Cmp/Attr+Cmp#beaivebálká+N+Sg+Acc: [dábálážžbeaivebálkká, dáválašbeaivebálkká]
    dábálaš+Err/Orth-a/á+A+Cmp/Attr+Cmp#beaivebálká+N+Sg+Acc: [dábalašbeaivebálkká]
    dábálaš+A+Cmp/Attr+Cmp#beaivebálká+N+Sg+Loc: dábálašbeaivebálkkás
    dábálaš+Err/Orth+Err/Orth+A+Cmp/Attr+Cmp#beaivebálká+N+Sg+Loc: [dáválážžbeaivebálkkás]
    dábálaš+Err/Orth-a/á+Err/Orth+A+Cmp/Attr+Cmp#beaivebálká+N+Sg+Loc: [dábalážžbeaivebálkkás]
    dábálaš+Err/Orth+A+Cmp/Attr+Cmp#beaivebálká+N+Sg+Loc: [dáválašbeaivebálkkás]
    dábálaš+Err/Orth+A+Cmp/Attr+Cmp#beaivebálká+N+Sg+Loc: [dábálážžbeaivebálkkás]
    dábálaš+Err/Orth-a/á+A+Cmp/Attr+Cmp#beaivebálká+N+Sg+Loc: [dábalašbeaivebálkkás]
    dábálaš+A+Cmp/Attr+Cmp#beaivebálká+N+Sg+Ill: dábálašbeaivebálkái
    dábálaš+Err/Orth+A+Cmp/Attr+Cmp#beaivebálká+N+Sg+Ill: [dábálážžbeaivebálkái, dáválašbeaivebálkái]
    dábálaš+Err/Orth-a/á+A+Cmp/Attr+Cmp#beaivebálká+N+Sg+Ill: [dábalašbeaivebálkái]
    dábálaš+Err/Orth+Err/Orth+A+Cmp/Attr+Cmp#beaivebálká+N+Sg+Ill: [dáválážžbeaivebálkái]
    dábálaš+Err/Orth-a/á+Err/Orth+A+Cmp/Attr+Cmp#beaivebálká+N+Sg+Ill: [dábalážžbeaivebálkái]
    dábálaš+A+Cmp/Attr+Cmp#beaivebálká+N+Sg+Com: dábálašbeaivebálkkáin
    dábálaš+Err/Orth+Err/Orth+A+Cmp/Attr+Cmp#beaivebálká+N+Err/Orth+Sg+Com: [dáválážžbeaivebálkkáin]
    dábálaš+Err/Orth-a/á+Err/Orth+A+Cmp/Attr+Cmp#beaivebálká+N+Err/Orth+Sg+Com: [dábalážžbeaivebálkkáin]
    dábálaš+Err/Orth+A+Cmp/Attr+Cmp#beaivebálká+N+Err/Orth+Sg+Com: [dábálážžbeaivebálkkáin]
    dábálaš+Err/Orth-a/á+A+Cmp/Attr+Cmp#beaivebálká+N+Err/Orth+Sg+Com: [dábalašbeaivebálkkáin]
    dábálaš+Err/Orth+A+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp#beaivi+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#bálká+N+Sg+Com: [dáválašbeaivebálkkáin]
    dábálaš+A+Cmp/Attr+Cmp#beaivebálká+N+Pl+Nom: dábálašbeaivebálkkát
    dábálaš+Err/Orth+A+Cmp/Attr+Cmp#beaivebálká+N+Pl+Nom: [dábálážžbeaivebálkkát, dáválašbeaivebálkkát]
    dábálaš+Err/Orth-a/á+A+Cmp/Attr+Cmp#beaivebálká+N+Pl+Nom: [dábalašbeaivebálkkát]
    dábálaš+Err/Orth+Err/Orth+A+Cmp/Attr+Cmp#beaivebálká+N+Pl+Nom+Err/Orth: [dáválážžbeaivebálkkák]
    dábálaš+Err/Orth-a/á+Err/Orth+A+Cmp/Attr+Cmp#beaivebálká+N+Pl+Nom+Err/Orth: [dábalážžbeaivebálkkák]
    dábálaš+Err/Orth+A+Cmp/Attr+Cmp#beaivebálká+N+Pl+Nom+Err/Orth: [dábálážžbeaivebálkkák, dáválašbeaivebálkkák]
    dábálaš+Err/Orth-a/á+A+Cmp/Attr+Cmp#beaivebálká+N+Pl+Nom+Err/Orth: [dábalašbeaivebálkkák]
    dábálaš+Err/Orth+Err/Orth+A+Cmp/Attr+Cmp#beaivebálká+N+Pl+Nom: [dáválážžbeaivebálkkát]
    dábálaš+Err/Orth-a/á+Err/Orth+A+Cmp/Attr+Cmp#beaivebálká+N+Pl+Nom: [dábalážžbeaivebálkkát]
    dábálaš+A+Cmp/Attr+Cmp#beaivebálká+N+Pl+Nom+Err/Orth: [dábálašbeaivebálkkák]
    dábálaš+A+Cmp/Attr+Cmp#beaivebálká+N+Pl+Gen: dábálašbeaivebálkkáid
    dábálaš+Err/Orth+A+Cmp/Attr+Cmp#beaivebálká+N+Err/Orth+Pl+Gen: [dáválašbeaivebálkkáid, dábálážžbeaivebálkkáid]
    dábálaš+Err/Orth-a/á+A+Cmp/Attr+Cmp#beaivebálká+N+Err/Orth+Pl+Gen: [dábalašbeaivebálkkáid]
    dábálaš+Err/Orth+Err/Orth+A+Cmp/Attr+Cmp#beaivebálká+N+Err/Orth+Pl+Gen: [dáválážžbeaivebálkkáid]
    dábálaš+Err/Orth-a/á+Err/Orth+A+Cmp/Attr+Cmp#beaivebálká+N+Err/Orth+Pl+Gen: [dábalážžbeaivebálkkáid]
    dábálaš+A+Cmp/Attr+Cmp#beaivebálká+N+Pl+Acc: dábálašbeaivebálkkáid
    dábálaš+Err/Orth+A+Cmp/Attr+Cmp#beaivebálká+N+Err/Orth+Pl+Acc: [dáválašbeaivebálkkáid, dábálážžbeaivebálkkáid]
    dábálaš+Err/Orth-a/á+A+Cmp/Attr+Cmp#beaivebálká+N+Err/Orth+Pl+Acc: [dábalašbeaivebálkkáid]
    dábálaš+Err/Orth+Err/Orth+A+Cmp/Attr+Cmp#beaivebálká+N+Err/Orth+Pl+Acc: [dáválážžbeaivebálkkáid]
    dábálaš+Err/Orth-a/á+Err/Orth+A+Cmp/Attr+Cmp#beaivebálká+N+Err/Orth+Pl+Acc: [dábalážžbeaivebálkkáid]
    dábálaš+A+Cmp/Attr+Cmp#beaivebálká+N+Pl+Loc: dábálašbeaivebálkkáin
    dábálaš+Err/Orth+Err/Orth+A+Cmp/Attr+Cmp#beaivebálká+N+Err/Orth+Pl+Loc: [dáválážžbeaivebálkkáin]
    dábálaš+Err/Orth-a/á+Err/Orth+A+Cmp/Attr+Cmp#beaivebálká+N+Err/Orth+Pl+Loc: [dábalážžbeaivebálkkáin]
    dábálaš+Err/Orth+A+Cmp/Attr+Cmp#beaivebálká+N+Err/Orth+Pl+Loc: [dábálážžbeaivebálkkáin, dáválašbeaivebálkkáin]
    dábálaš+Err/Orth-a/á+A+Cmp/Attr+Cmp#beaivebálká+N+Err/Orth+Pl+Loc: [dábalašbeaivebálkkáin]
    dábálaš+A+Cmp/Attr+Cmp#beaivebálká+N+Pl+Ill: dábálašbeaivebálkkáide
    dábálaš+Err/Orth+A+Cmp/Attr+Cmp#beaivebálká+N+Pl+Ill: [dábálážžbeaivebálkkáide]
    dábálaš+Err/Orth+Err/Orth+A+Cmp/Attr+Cmp#beaivebálká+N+Err/Orth+Pl+Ill: [dáválážžbeaivebálkkáide]
    dábálaš+Err/Orth-a/á+Err/Orth+A+Cmp/Attr+Cmp#beaivebálká+N+Err/Orth+Pl+Ill: [dábalážžbeaivebálkkáide]
    dábálaš+Err/Orth+A+Cmp/Attr+Cmp#beaivebálká+N+Err/Orth+Pl+Ill: [dáválašbeaivebálkkáide]
    dábálaš+Err/Orth-a/á+A+Cmp/Attr+Cmp#beaivebálká+N+Err/Orth+Pl+Ill: [dábalašbeaivebálkkáide]
    dábálaš+A+Cmp/Attr+Cmp#beaivebálká+N+Pl+Com: dábálašbeaivebálkkáiguin
    dábálaš+Err/Orth+A+Cmp/Attr+Cmp#beaivebálká+N+Err/Orth+Pl+Com: [dáválašbeaivebálkkáiguin, dábálážžbeaivebálkkáiguin]
    dábálaš+Err/Orth-a/á+A+Cmp/Attr+Cmp#beaivebálká+N+Err/Orth+Pl+Com: [dábalašbeaivebálkkáiguin]
    dábálaš+Err/Orth+Err/Orth+A+Cmp/Attr+Cmp#beaivebálká+N+Err/Orth+Pl+Com: [dáválážžbeaivebálkkáiguin]
    dábálaš+Err/Orth-a/á+Err/Orth+A+Cmp/Attr+Cmp#beaivebálká+N+Err/Orth+Pl+Com: [dábalážžbeaivebálkkáiguin]
    dábálaš+A+Cmp/Attr+Cmp#beaivebálká+N+Ess: dábálašbeaivebálkán
    dábálaš+Err/Orth+Err/Orth+A+Cmp/Attr+Cmp#beaivebálká+N+Ess: [dáválážžbeaivebálkán]
    dábálaš+Err/Orth-a/á+Err/Orth+A+Cmp/Attr+Cmp#beaivebálká+N+Ess: [dábalážžbeaivebálkán]
    dábálaš+Err/Orth+A+Cmp/Attr+Cmp#beaivebálká+N+Ess: [dáválašbeaivebálkán, dábálážžbeaivebálkán]
    dábálaš+Err/Orth-a/á+A+Cmp/Attr+Cmp#beaivebálká+N+Ess: [dábalašbeaivebálkán]
    dábálaš+A+Cmp/Attr+Cmp#beaivebálká+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: dábálašbeaivebálkkáš
    dábálaš+Err/Orth+Err/Orth+A+Cmp/Attr+Cmp#beaivebálká+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: [dáválážžbeaivebálkkáš]
    dábálaš+Err/Orth+A+Cmp/Attr+Cmp#beaivebálká+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: [dáválašbeaivebálkkáš, dábálážžbeaivebálkkáš]
    dábálaš+Err/Orth-a/á+A+Cmp/Attr+Cmp#beaivebálká+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: [dábalašbeaivebálkkáš]
    dábálaš+Err/Orth-a/á+Err/Orth+A+Cmp/Attr+Cmp#beaivebálká+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: [dábalážžbeaivebálkkáš]
    dábálaš+A+Cmp/Attr+Cmp#beaivebálká+N+Der/Dimin+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: dábálašbeaivebálkkážaš
    dábálaš+Err/Orth+Err/Orth+A+Cmp/Attr+Cmp#beaivebálká+N+Der/Dimin+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: [dáválážžbeaivebálkkážaš]
    dábálaš+Err/Orth-a/á+Err/Orth+A+Cmp/Attr+Cmp#beaivebálká+N+Der/Dimin+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: [dábalážžbeaivebálkkážaš]
    dábálaš+Err/Orth+A+Cmp/Attr+Cmp#beaivebálká+N+Der/Dimin+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: [dábálážžbeaivebálkkážaš, dáválašbeaivebálkkážaš]
    dábálaš+Err/Orth-a/á+A+Cmp/Attr+Cmp#beaivebálká+N+Der/Dimin+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: [dábalašbeaivebálkkážaš]
    dábálaš+A+Cmp/Attr+Cmp#beaivebálká+N+Der/Car+A+Sg+Nom: dábálašbeaivebálkkáheapme
    dábálaš+Err/Orth+Err/Orth+A+Cmp/Attr+Cmp#beaivebálká+N+Der/Car+A+Sg+Nom+Err/Orth: [dáválážžbeaivebálkkáhin, dáválážžbeaivebálkkáheapmi]
    dábálaš+Err/Orth-a/á+Err/Orth+A+Cmp/Attr+Cmp#beaivebálká+N+Der/Car+A+Sg+Nom+Err/Orth: [dábalážžbeaivebálkkáheapmi, dábalážžbeaivebálkkáhin]
    dábálaš+Err/Orth-a/á+Err/Orth+A+Cmp/Attr+Cmp#beaivebálká+N+Der/Car+A+Sg+Nom: dábalážžbeaivebálkkáheapme
    dábálaš+Err/Orth+A+Cmp/Attr+Cmp#beaivebálká+N+Der/Car+A+Sg+Nom: [dáválašbeaivebálkkáheapme, dábálážžbeaivebálkkáheapme]
    dábálaš+Err/Orth-a/á+A+Cmp/Attr+Cmp#beaivebálká+N+Der/Car+A+Sg+Nom: [dábalašbeaivebálkkáheapme]
    dábálaš+Err/Orth+A+Cmp/Attr+Cmp#beaivebálká+N+Der/Car+A+Sg+Nom+Err/Orth: [dáválašbeaivebálkkáheapmi, dábálážžbeaivebálkkáheapmi, dábálážžbeaivebálkkáhin]
    dábálaš+Err/Orth-a/á+A+Cmp/Attr+Cmp#beaivebálká+N+Der/Car+A+Sg+Nom+Err/Orth: [dábalašbeaivebálkkáhin, dábalašbeaivebálkkáheapmi]
    dábálaš+A+Cmp/Attr+Cmp#beaivebálká+N+Der/Car+A+Sg+Nom+Err/Orth: [dábálašbeaivebálkkáhin, dábálašbeaivebálkkáheapmi]
    dábálaš+Err/Orth+A+Cmp/Attr+Cmp#beaivebálká+N+Der/Car+A+Sg+Nom+Err/Orth: [dáválašbeaivebálkkáhin]
    dábálaš+A+Cmp/Attr+Cmp#beaivebálká+N+Der/lasj+A+Sg+Nom: dábálašbeaivebálkkálaš
    dábálaš+Err/Orth+A+Cmp/Attr+Cmp#beaivebálká+N+Der/lasj+A+Sg+Nom: [dáválašbeaivebálkkálaš, dábálážžbeaivebálkkálaš]
    dábálaš+Err/Orth-a/á+A+Cmp/Attr+Cmp#beaivebálká+N+Der/lasj+A+Sg+Nom: [dábalašbeaivebálkkálaš]
    dábálaš+Err/Orth+Err/Orth+A+Cmp/Attr+Cmp#beaivebálká+N+Der/lasj+A+Sg+Nom: [dáválážžbeaivebálkkálaš]
    dábálaš+Err/Orth-a/á+Err/Orth+A+Cmp/Attr+Cmp#beaivebálká+N+Der/lasj+A+Sg+Nom: [dábalážžbeaivebálkkálaš]
    
    dábálaš+A+Cmp/Attr+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#beaivebálká+N+Sg+Nom: dábálaš-beaivebálká
    dábálaš+Err/Orth+A+Cmp/Attr+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#beaivebálká+N+Sg+Nom: [dábálážž-beaivebálká]
    dábálaš+Err/Orth-a/á+A+Cmp/Attr+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#beaivebálká+N+Sg+Nom: [dábalaš-beaivebálká]
    dábálaš+Err/Orth+Err/Orth+A+Cmp/Attr+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#beaivebálká+N+Sg+Nom: [dáválážž-beaivebálká]
    dábálaš+Err/Orth-a/á+Err/Orth+A+Cmp/Attr+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#beaivebálká+N+Sg+Nom: [dábalážž-beaivebálká]
    dábálaš+Err/Orth+A+Cmp/Attr+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#beaivebálká+N+Sg+Nom: dáválaš-beaivebálká
    dábálaš+A+Cmp/Attr+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#beaivebálká+N+Sg+Gen: dábálaš-beaivebálkká
    dábálaš+Err/Orth+Err/Orth+A+Cmp/Attr+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#beaivebálká+N+Sg+Gen: [dáválážž-beaivebálkká]
    dábálaš+Err/Orth-a/á+Err/Orth+A+Cmp/Attr+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#beaivebálká+N+Sg+Gen: [dábalážž-beaivebálkká]
    dábálaš+Err/Orth+A+Cmp/Attr+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#beaivebálká+N+Sg+Gen: [dábálážž-beaivebálkká, dáválaš-beaivebálkká]
    dábálaš+Err/Orth-a/á+A+Cmp/Attr+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#beaivebálká+N+Sg+Gen: [dábalaš-beaivebálkká]
    dábálaš+A+Cmp/Attr+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#beaivebálká+N+Sg+Acc: dábálaš-beaivebálkká
    dábálaš+Err/Orth+Err/Orth+A+Cmp/Attr+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#beaivebálká+N+Sg+Acc: [dáválážž-beaivebálkká]
    dábálaš+Err/Orth-a/á+Err/Orth+A+Cmp/Attr+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#beaivebálká+N+Sg+Acc: [dábalážž-beaivebálkká]
    dábálaš+Err/Orth+A+Cmp/Attr+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#beaivebálká+N+Sg+Acc: [dábálážž-beaivebálkká, dáválaš-beaivebálkká]
    dábálaš+Err/Orth-a/á+A+Cmp/Attr+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#beaivebálká+N+Sg+Acc: [dábalaš-beaivebálkká]
    dábálaš+A+Cmp/Attr+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#beaivebálká+N+Sg+Loc: dábálaš-beaivebálkkás
    dábálaš+Err/Orth+A+Cmp/Attr+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#beaivebálká+N+Sg+Loc: [dáválaš-beaivebálkkás, dábálážž-beaivebálkkás]
    dábálaš+Err/Orth-a/á+A+Cmp/Attr+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#beaivebálká+N+Sg+Loc: [dábalaš-beaivebálkkás]
    dábálaš+Err/Orth+Err/Orth+A+Cmp/Attr+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#beaivebálká+N+Sg+Loc: [dáválážž-beaivebálkkás]
    dábálaš+Err/Orth-a/á+Err/Orth+A+Cmp/Attr+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#beaivebálká+N+Sg+Loc: [dábalážž-beaivebálkkás]
    dábálaš+A+Cmp/Attr+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#beaivebálká+N+Sg+Ill: dábálaš-beaivebálkái
    dábálaš+Err/Orth+A+Cmp/Attr+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#beaivebálká+N+Sg+Ill: [dábálážž-beaivebálkái, dáválaš-beaivebálkái]
    dábálaš+Err/Orth-a/á+A+Cmp/Attr+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#beaivebálká+N+Sg+Ill: [dábalaš-beaivebálkái]
    dábálaš+Err/Orth+Err/Orth+A+Cmp/Attr+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#beaivebálká+N+Sg+Ill: [dáválážž-beaivebálkái]
